California statutes. Civil Code
(4) A franchisor who permits a franchisee described in paragraph (3) to process, deposit, negotiate, or obtain payment of a credit card charge through that franchisor’s account or agreement.

(5) The credit card issuer or a financial institution or a parent, subsidiary, or affiliate of the card issuer or a financial institution.

(6) A person who processes, deposits, negotiates, or obtains payment of less than five hundred dollars ($500) of credit card charges in any one year period through a retailer’s
 account or agreement. The person shall have the burden of producing evidence that the person transacted less than five hundred dollars ($500) in credit card charges during any one year period.

(d) Any person injured by a violation of this section may bring an action for the recovery of damages, equitable relief, and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(e) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each occurrence in which a person processes, deposits, negotiates, or otherwise seeks to obtain payment of a credit card charge in violation of subdivision (a) constitutes a separate offense.

(f) The penalties and remedies provided in this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties provided by law.

(g) The
 exemptions from this title specified in Section 1747.03 do not apply to this section.

(h) As used in this section:

(1) “General merchandise retailer” means any person or entity, regardless of the form of organization, that has continuously offered for sale or lease more than 100 different types of goods or services to the public in this state throughout a period which includes the immediately preceding five years.

(2) “Franchisor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 31007 of the Corporations Code.

(3) “Franchisee” has the same meaning as defined in Section 31006 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 855, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.9.

(a) A credit card issuer that extends credit to a cardholder through the use of a preprinted check or draft shall disclose on the front of an attachment that is affixed by perforation or other means to the preprinted check or draft, in clear and conspicuous language, all of the following information:

(1) That “use of the attached check or draft will constitute a charge against your credit account.”

(2) The annual percentage rate and the calculation of finance charges, as required by Section 226.16 of Regulation Z of the Code of Federal Regulations, associated with the use of the attached check or draft.

(3) Whether the finance charges are triggered immediately upon the use of the check or draft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 171.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.95.

(a) (1) Upon the request of a person who has obtained a police report pursuant to Section 530.6 of the Penal Code, a credit card issuer shall provide to the person, or to a law enforcement officer specified by the person, copies of all application forms or application information containing the person’s name, address, or other identifying information pertaining to the application filed with the credit card issuer by an unauthorized person in violation of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code.

(2) Before providing copies pursuant to paragraph (1), the credit card issuer shall inform the requesting person of the categories of identifying information that the unauthorized person used to complete the application and shall require the requesting person to provide identifying information in those categories and a copy of the police report.

(3) The credit card issuer shall provide copies of all forms and information required by this section, without charge, within 10 business days of receipt of the person’s request and submission of the required copy of the police report and identifying information.

(b) (1) Before a credit card issuer provides copies to a law enforcement officer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the credit card issuer may require the requesting person to provide
 them with a signed and dated statement by which the person does all of the following:

(A) Authorizes disclosure for a stated period.

(B) Specifies the name of the agency or department to which the disclosure is authorized.

(C) Identifies the type of records that the person authorizes to be disclosed.

(2) The credit card issuer shall include in the statement to be signed by the requesting person a notice that the person has the right at any time to revoke the authorization.

(c) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means a peace officer as defined by Section 830.1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 493, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.3A. CREDIT CARD DISCLOSURE [1748.10. - 1748.14.]

1748.10.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Areias Credit Card Full Disclosure Act of 1986.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.11.

(a) Any application form or preapproved written solicitation for an open-end credit card account to be used for personal, family, or household purposes that is mailed on or after October 1, 1987, to a consumer residing in this state by or on behalf of a creditor, whether or not the creditor is located in this state, other than an application form or solicitation included in a magazine, newspaper, or other publication distributed by someone other than the creditor, shall contain or be accompanied by either of the following
 disclosures:

(1) A disclosure of each of the following, if applicable:

(A) Any periodic rate or rates that may be applied to the account, expressed as an annual percentage rate or rates. If the account is subject to a variable rate, the creditor may instead either disclose the rate as of a specific date and indicate that the rate may vary, or identify the index and any amount or percentage added to, or subtracted from, that index and used to determine the rate. For purposes of this section, that amount or percentage shall be referred to as the “spread.”

(B) Any membership or participation fee that may be imposed for availability of a credit card account, expressed as an annualized amount.

(C) Any per transaction fee that may be imposed on purchases,
 expressed as an amount or as a percentage of the transaction, as applicable.

(D) If the creditor provides a period during which the consumer may repay the full balance reflected on a billing statement that is attributable to purchases of goods or services from the creditor or from merchants participating in the credit card plan, without the imposition of additional finance charges, the creditor shall either disclose the number of days of that period, calculated from the closing date of the prior billing cycle to the date designated in the billing statement sent to the consumer as the date by which that payment must be received to avoid additional finance charges, or describe the manner in which the period is calculated. For purposes of this section, the period shall be referred to as the “free period” or “free-ride period.” If the creditor does not provide this period for purchases, the disclosure shall so indicate.

(2) A disclosure that satisfies the initial disclosure statement requirements of Regulation Z.

(b) A creditor need not present the disclosures required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) in chart form or use any specific terminology, except as expressly provided in this section. The following chart shall not be construed in any way as a standard by which to determine whether a creditor who elects not to use such a chart has provided the required disclosures in a manner that satisfies paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). However, disclosures shall be conclusively presumed to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if a chart with captions substantially as follows is completed with the applicable terms offered by the creditor, or if the creditor presents the applicable terms in tabular, list, or narrative format using terminology substantially similar to the captions
 included in the following chart:THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION IS PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THE 
AREIAS CREDIT CARD FULL DISCLOSURE ACT OF 1986: 
INTEREST RATES, FEES, AND FREE-RIDE PERIOD FOR PURCHASES 
UNDER THIS CREDIT CARD ACCOUNT

ANNUAL
 PER-
CENTAGE
 RATE (1)

VARIABLE
 RATE 
 INDEX AND 
SPREAD (2)ANNUAL-
IZED
 MEMBER-
SHIP
 OR PARTICI-
PATION
 FEE

TRANS-
ACTION
 FEE

FREE–RIDE
 PERIOD (3)(1) For fixed interest rates. If variable rate, creditor may elect to disclose a rate as of a specified date and indicate that the rate may vary.

(2) For variable interest rates. If fixed rate, creditor may eliminate the column, leave the column blank, or indicate “No” or “None” or “Does not apply.”

(3) For example, “30 days” or “Yes, if full payment is received by next billing date” or “Yes, if full new balance is paid by due date.”

(c) For purposes of this section, “Regulation Z” has the meaning attributed to it under Section 1802.18, and all of the terms used in this section have the same meaning as attributed to them
 in federal Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. 226.1 et seq.). For the purposes of this section, “open-end credit card account” does not include an account accessed by a device described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1747.02.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to prohibit a creditor from disclosing additional terms, conditions, or information, whether or not relating to the disclosures required under this section, in conjunction with the disclosures required by this section.

(e) If a creditor is required under federal law to make any disclosure of the terms applicable to a credit card account in connection with application forms or solicitations, the creditor shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) with respect to those application forms or solicitations if the creditor complies with the federal
 disclosure requirement. For example, in lieu of complying with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a creditor has the option of disclosing the specific terms required to be disclosed in an advertisement under Regulation Z, if the application forms or solicitations constitute advertisements in which specific terms must be disclosed under Regulation Z.

(f) If for any reason the requirements of this section do not apply equally to creditors located in this state and creditors not located in this state, then the requirements applicable to creditors located in this state shall automatically be reduced to the extent necessary to establish equal requirements for both categories of creditors, until it is otherwise determined by a court of law in a proceeding to which the creditor located in this state is a party.

(g) All application forms for an open-end credit card
 account distributed in this state on or after October 1, 1987, other than by mail, shall contain a statement in substantially the following form:

“If you wish to receive disclosure of the terms of this credit card, pursuant to the Areias Credit Card Full Disclosure Act of 1986, check here and return to the address on this application.”

A box shall be printed in or next to this statement for placement of such a checkmark.

However, this subdivision does not apply if the application contains the disclosures provided for in this title.

(h) This title does not apply to any application form or written advertisement or an open-end credit card account where the credit to be extended will be secured by a lien on real or personal property or both real and personal property.

(i) This title does not apply to any person who is subject to Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 1810.20) of Chapter 1 of Title 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.12.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Cardholder” means any consumer to whom a credit card is issued, provided that, when more than one credit card has been issued for the same account, all persons holding those credit cards may be treated as a single cardholder.

(2) “Credit card” means any card, plate, coupon book, or other single credit device existing for the purpose of being used
 from time to time upon presentation to obtain money, property, labor, or services on credit. “Credit card” does not mean any of the following:

(A) Any single credit device used to obtain telephone property, labor, or services in any transaction under public utility tariffs.

(B) Any device that may be used to obtain credit pursuant to an electronic fund transfer but only if the credit is obtained under an agreement between a consumer and a financial institution to extend credit when the consumer’s asset account is overdrawn or to maintain a specified minimum balance in the consumer’s asset account.

(C) Any key or card key used at an automated dispensing outlet to obtain or purchase petroleum products, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 13401 of the Business and Professions Code, which will be used primarily for
 business rather than personal or family purposes.

(3) “Marketing information” means the categorization of cardholders compiled by a credit card issuer, based on a cardholder’s shopping patterns, spending history, or behavioral characteristics derived from account activity which is provided to a marketer of goods or services or a subsidiary or affiliate organization of the company that collects the information for consideration. “Marketing information” does not include aggregate data that does not identify a cardholder based on the cardholder’s shopping patterns, spending history, or behavioral characteristics derived from account activity or any communications to any person in connection with any transfer, processing, billing, collection, chargeback, fraud prevention, credit card recovery, or acquisition of or for credit card accounts.

(b) If the credit card issuer discloses
 marketing information concerning a cardholder to any person, the credit card issuer shall provide a written notice to the cardholder that clearly and conspicuously describes the cardholder’s right to prohibit the disclosure of marketing information concerning the cardholder which discloses the cardholder’s identity. The notice shall be in 10-point type and shall advise the cardholder of his or her ability to respond either by completing a preprinted form or a toll-free telephone number that the cardholder may call to exercise this right.

(c) The requirements of subdivision (b) shall be satisfied by furnishing the notice to the cardholder:

(1) At least 60 days prior to the initial disclosure of marketing information concerning the cardholder by the credit card issuer.

(2) For all new credit cards issued on or after
 April 1, 2002, on the form containing the new credit card when the credit card is delivered to the cardholder.

(3) At least once per calendar year, to every cardholder entitled to receive an annual statement of billings rights pursuant to 12 C.F.R. 226.9 (Regulation Z). The notice required by this paragraph may be included on or with any periodic statement or with the delivery of the renewal card.

(d) (1) The cardholder’s election to prohibit disclosure of marketing information shall be effective only with respect to marketing information that is disclosed to any party beginning 30 days after the credit card issuer has received, at the designated address on the form containing the new credit card or on the preprinted form, or by telephone, the cardholder’s election to prohibit disclosure. This does not apply to the disclosure of marketing information prior to
 the cardholder’s notification to the credit card issuer of the cardholder’s election.

(2) An election to prohibit disclosure of marketing information shall terminate upon receipt by the credit card issuer of notice from the cardholder that the cardholder’s election to prohibit disclosure is no longer effective.

(e) The requirements of this section do not apply to any of the following communications of marketing information by a credit card issuer:

(1) Communications to any party to, or merchant specified in, the credit card agreement, or to any person whose name appears on the credit card or on whose behalf the credit card is issued.

(2) Communications to consumer credit reporting agencies, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1785.3.

(3) To the extent that the Fair Credit Reporting Act preempts the requirements of this section as to communication by a credit card issuer to a corporate subsidiary or affiliate, the credit card issuer may communicate information about a cardholder to a corporate subsidiary or affiliate to the extent and in the manner permitted under that act.

(4) Communications to a third party when the third party is responsible for conveying information from the card issuer to any of its cardholders.

(f) If the laws of the United States require disclosure to cardholders regarding the use of personal information, compliance with the federal requirements shall be deemed to be compliance with this section.

(g) This section shall become operative on April 1,
 2002.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 977, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Section operative April 1, 2002, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.13.

(a) A credit card issuer shall, with each billing statement provided to a cardholder in this state, provide the following on the front of the first page of the billing statement in type no smaller than that required for any other required disclosure, but in no case in less than 8-point capitalized type:

(1) A written statement in the following form: “Minimum Payment Warning: Making only the minimum payment will increase the interest you pay and the time it takes to repay your balance.”

(2) Either of the following:

(A) A written statement in the form of and containing the information described in clause (i) or (ii), as applicable, as
 follows:

(i) A written three-line statement, as follows:
“A one thousand dollar ($1,000) balance will take 17 years and three months to pay off at a total cost of two thousand five hundred ninety dollars and thirty-five cents ($2,590.35). 
A two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500) balance will take 30 years and three months to pay off at a total cost of seven thousand seven hundred thirty-three dollars and forty-nine cents ($7,733.49). 
A five thousand dollar ($5,000) balance will take 40 years and two months to pay off at a total cost of sixteen thousand three hundred five dollars and thirty-four cents ($16,305.34). 
This information is based on an annual percentage rate of 17 percent and a minimum payment of 2 percent or ten dollars ($10), whichever is greater.”

In the alternative, a credit card issuer may provide
 this information for the three specified amounts at the annual percentage rate and required minimum payment which are applicable to the cardholder’s account. The statement provided shall be immediately preceded by the statement required by paragraph (1).

(ii) Instead of the information required by clause (i), retail credit card issuers shall provide a written three-line statement to read, as follows:
“A two hundred fifty dollar ($250) balance will take two years and eight months to pay off a total cost of three hundred twenty-five dollars and twenty-four cents ($325.24). 
A five hundred dollar ($500) balance will take four years and five months to pay off at a total cost of seven hundred nine dollars and ninety cents ($709.90). 
A seven hundred fifty dollar ($750) balance will take five years and five months to pay off at a total cost of one thousand ninety-four dollars
 and forty-nine cents ($1,094.49). 
This information is based on an annual percentage rate of 21 percent and a minimum payment of 5 percent or ten dollars ($10), whichever is greater.”

In the alternative, a retail credit card issuer may provide this information for the three specified amounts at the annual percentage rate and required minimum payment which are applicable to the cardholder’s account. The statement provided shall be immediately preceded by the statement required by paragraph (1). A retail credit card issuer is not required to provide this statement if the cardholder has a balance of less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(B) A written statement providing individualized information indicating an estimate of the number of years and months and the approximate total cost to pay off the entire balance due on an open-end credit card account if the cardholder were to pay only the
 minimum amount due on the open-ended account based upon the terms of the credit agreement. For purposes of this subparagraph only, if the account is subject to a variable rate, the creditor may make disclosures based on the rate for the entire balance as of the date of the disclosure and indicate that the rate may vary. In addition, the cardholder shall be provided with referrals or, in the alternative, with the “800” telephone number of the National Foundation for Credit Counseling through which the cardholder can be referred, to credit counseling services in, or closest to, the cardholder’s county of residence. The credit counseling service shall be in good standing with the National Foundation for Credit Counseling or accredited by the Council on Accreditation for Children and Family Services. The creditor is required to provide, or continue to provide, the information required by this paragraph only if the cardholder has not paid more than the minimum payment for six consecutive months, after July 1,
 2002.

(3) (A) A written statement in the following form: “For an estimate of the time it would take to repay your balance, making only minimum payments, and the total amount of those payments, call this toll-free telephone number: (Insert toll-free telephone number).” This statement shall be provided immediately following the statement required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2). A credit card issuer is not required to provide this statement if the disclosure required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) has been provided.

(B) The toll-free telephone number shall be available between the hours of 8 a.m. and 9 p.m., Pacific standard time, seven days a week, and shall provide consumers with the opportunity to speak with a person, rather than a recording, from whom the information described in subparagraph (A) may be obtained.

(C) The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall establish a detailed table illustrating the approximate number of months that it would take and the approximate total cost to repay an outstanding balance if the consumer pays only the required minimum monthly payments and if no other additional charges or fees are incurred on the account, such as additional extension of credit, voluntary credit insurance, late fees, or dishonored check fees by assuming all of the following:

(i) A significant number of different annual percentage rates.

(ii) A significant number of different account balances, with the difference between sequential examples of balances being no greater than one hundred dollars ($100).

(iii) A significant number of different
 minimum payment amounts.

(iv) That only minimum monthly payments are made and no additional charges or fees are incurred on the account, such as additional extensions of credit, voluntary credit insurance, late fees, or dishonored check fees.

(D) A creditor that receives a request for information described in subparagraph (A) from a cardholder through the toll-free telephone number disclosed under subparagraph (A), or who is required to provide the information required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), may satisfy its obligation to disclose an estimate of the time it would take and the approximate total cost to repay the cardholder’s balance by disclosing only the information set forth in the table described in subparagraph (C). Including the full chart along with a billing statement does not satisfy the obligation under this section.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Credit card” has the same meaning as in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1748.12.

(2) “Open-end credit card account” means an account in which consumer credit is granted by a creditor under a plan in which the creditor reasonably contemplates repeated transactions, the creditor may impose a finance charge from time to time on an unpaid balance, and the amount of credit that may be extended to the consumer during the term of the plan is generally made available to the extent that any outstanding balance is repaid and up to any limit set by the creditor.

(3) “Retail credit card” means a credit card is issued by or on behalf of a retailer, or a private label credit card that is limited to customers of a specific
 retailer.

(c) (1) This section shall not apply in any billing cycle in which the account agreement requires a minimum payment of at least 10 percent of the outstanding balance.

(2) This section shall not apply in any billing cycle in which finance charges are not imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 19.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.14.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.3B. CHARGE CARD DISCLOSURES [1748.20. - 1748.23.]

1748.20.

This title may be cited as the “ Areias-Robbins Charge Card Full Disclosure Act of 1986.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1397, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.21.

For the purposes of this title:

(a) “Charge card” means any card, plate, or other credit device pursuant to which the charge card issuer extends credit to the charge cardholder, primarily for personal, family, or household purposes where (1) the credit extended does not subject the charge cardholder to a finance charge and (2) the charge cardholder cannot automatically access credit that is repayable in installments.

(b) “Charge cardholder” means the person to whom a charge card is issued.

(c) “Charge card issuer” means any person that issues a charge card or that person’s agent with respect to the card.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1397, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.22.

(a) On and after October 1, 1987, issuers of charge cards shall clearly and conspicuously disclose in any charge card application form or preapproved written solicitation for a charge card mailed to a consumer who resides in this state to apply for a charge card, whether or not the charge card issuer is located in this state, other than an application form or solicitation included in a magazine, newspaper, or other publication distributed by someone other than the charge card issuer, the following information:

(1) Any fee or charge assessed for or which may be assessed for the issuance or renewal of the charge card, expressed as an annualized amount. The fee or charge required to be disclosed pursuant to this paragraph shall be denominated as an “annual fee.”

(2) The charge card does not permit the charge cardholder to defer payment of charges incurred by the use of the charge card upon receipt of a periodic statement of charges from the charge card issuer.

(3) Any fee that may be assessed for an extension of credit to a charge cardholder where the extension of credit is made by the charge card issuer, and is not a credit sale and where the charge cardholder receives the extension of credit in the form of cash or where the charge cardholder obtains the extension of credit through the use of a preprinted check, draft, or
 similar credit device provided by the charge card issuer to obtain an extension of credit. This fee shall be denominated as a “cash advance fee” in the disclosure required by this paragraph.

(b) A charge card issuer shall be conclusively presumed to have complied with the disclosure requirements of subdivision (a) if the table set out in subdivision (b) of Section 1748.11 is completed with the applicable terms offered by the charge card issuer in a clear and conspicuous manner and the completed table in subdivision (b) of Section 1748.11 is then provided to the person invited to apply for the charge card as a part of or in material which accompanies the charge card application or written advertisement which invites a person to apply for a charge card.

The charge card issuer shall include as part of table set out in subdivision (b) of Section 1748.11 the following sentences in the boxes or in a footnote
 outside of the boxes that relate to the interest rate disclosure: “This is a charge card which does not permit the charge cardholder to pay for purchases made using this charge card in installments. All charges made by a person to whom the charge card is issued are due and payable upon the receipt of a periodic statement of charges by the charge cardholder.”

The inclusion or exclusion of an expiration date with table set out in subdivision (b) of Section 1748.11 or the use of footnotes in the boxes of the table to set out the information required to be disclosed by this section outside of the boxes of the table set out in subdivision (b) of Section 1748.11 shall not affect the conclusive presumption of compliance pursuant to this subdivision. If a charge card issuer does not offer or require one of the selected attributes of credit cards in the table set out in subdivision (b) of Section 1748.11 the charge card issuer shall employ the phrase in the appropriate box
 or in the appropriate footnote “Not offered” or “Not required” or a substantially similar phrase without losing the conclusive presumption of compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a). If one of the selected attributes of charge cards required to be disclosed pursuant to subdivision (a) is not applicable to the charge card issuer, the charge card issuer may employ in the appropriate box or in the appropriate footnote outside of the box in the table set out in subdivision (b) of Section 1748.11 the phrase “Not applicable” or a substantially similar phrase without losing the conclusive presumption of compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to prohibit a charge card issuer from disclosing additional terms, conditions, or information, whether or not relating to the disclosures required under this section by subdivision (a) or in connection with the disclosure provided
 in subdivision (b), in conjunction with the disclosures required by this section.

(d) If the charge card issuer offers to the charge cardholder any program or service under which the charge cardholder may elect to access open-end credit, the charge card issuer shall provide to the charge cardholder, before the charge cardholder has the right to access that credit, the initial disclosure statement required by Regulation Z, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1748.10.

(e) All charge card application forms distributed in this state on or after October 1, 1987, other than by mail, shall contain a statement in substantially the following form:

“If you wish to receive disclosure of the terms of this credit card, pursuant to the Areias Charge Card Full Disclosure Act of 1986, check here and return to the address on this application.”

A box shall be printed in or next to this statement for placing such a checkmark.

However, this subdivision does not apply if the application contains the disclosures provided for in this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 375, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.23.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.3C. DEBIT CARDS [1748.30. - 1748.32.]

1748.30.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Accepted debit card” means any debit card which the debit cardholder has requested and received or has signed, or has used, or has authorized another person to use, for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services. Any debit card issued in renewal of, or in substitution for, an accepted debit card becomes an accepted debit card when received by the debit cardholder, whether the debit card is issued by the same
 or by a successor card issuer.

(b) “Account” means a demand deposit (checking), savings, or other consumer asset account, other than an occasional or incidental credit balance in a credit plan, established primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(c) “Adequate notice” has the same meaning as found in subdivision (k) of Section 1747.02.

(d) “Debit card” means an accepted debit card or other means of access to a debit cardholder’s account that may be used to initiate electronic funds transfers and may be used without unique identifying information such as a personal identification number to initiate access to the debit cardholder’s account.

(e) “Debit card issuer” means any person who issues a debit card or the agent of that person for that
 purpose.

(f) “Debit cardholder” means a natural person to whom a debit card is issued.

(g) “Unauthorized use” means the use of a debit card by a person, other than the debit cardholder, to initiate an electronic fund transfer from the debit cardholder’s account without actual authority to initiate the transfer and from which the debit cardholder receives no benefit. The term does not include an electronic fund transfer initiated in any of the following manners:

(1) By a person who was furnished the debit card to the debit cardholder’s account by the debit cardholder, unless the debit cardholder has notified the debit card issuer that transfers by that person are no longer authorized.

(2) With fraudulent intent by the debit cardholder or any person
 acting in concert with the debit cardholder.

(3) By the debit card issuer or its employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.31.

(a) A debit cardholder shall be liable for an unauthorized use of a debit card only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The card is an accepted debit card.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the liability is not in excess of fifty dollars ($50).

(3) The debit card issuer has given adequate notice to the debit cardholder of the
 potential liability.

(4) The debit card issuer has provided the debit cardholder with a description of the means by which the debit card issuer may be notified of loss or theft of the card.

(5) The unauthorized use occurs before the debit card issuer has been notified by the debit cardholder that an unauthorized use of the debit card has occurred or may occur as a result of loss, theft, or otherwise.

(6) The debit card issuer has provided a means to identify the debit cardholder to whom the debit card was issued.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the debit cardholder fails to report an unauthorized use that appears on a periodic statement within 60 days of the debit card issuer’s transmittal of the statement, and if the issuer establishes that an
 unauthorized use would not have occurred had the debit cardholder notified the issuer within the 60-day period, the debit cardholder shall be liable for the amount of each unauthorized transfer that occurs after the close of the 60 days and before notice to the issuer. If the debit cardholder’s delay in notifying the debit card issuer was due to extenuating circumstances beyond the debit cardholder’s reasonable control, the time specified above shall be extended by a reasonable period. For the purposes of this subdivision, examples of extenuating circumstances include, but are not limited to, extended travel, the death or serious illness of the debit cardholder or a member of the debit cardholder’s family, hospitalization, permanent mental impairment, or serious physical impairment, unless the circumstance did not reasonably contribute to the cardholder’s delay in notifying the debit card issuer within the 60-day period.

(c) A debit cardholder
 shall have no liability for erroneous or fraudulent transfers initiated by a debit card issuer, its agent, or employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.32.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.3.5. Consumer Refunds [1748.40. - 1748.84.]



  CHAPTER 1. Prepaid Debit Cards [1748.40. - 1748.41.]

1748.40.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Accepted debit card” means any debit card which the debit cardholder has requested and received or has signed, or has used, or has authorized another person to use, for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services. Any debit card issued in renewal of, or in substitution for, an accepted debit card becomes an accepted debit card when received by the debit cardholder, whether the debit card is issued by the same or by a successor card issuer.

(b) “Business” means a proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other form of commercial enterprise. “Business” does not include a restaurant.

(c) “Cardholder” means
 a natural person to whom a prepaid debit card is issued.

(d) “Debit card” means an accepted debit card or other means of access to a debit cardholder’s account that may be used to initiate electronic funds transfers and may be used without unique identifying information such as a personal identification number to initiate access to the debit cardholder’s account.

(e) “Prepaid debit card” means a debit card that meets either of the following:

(1) A card, code, or other means of access to funds of a recipient that is usable at multiple, unaffiliated merchants for goods or services, or usable at automated teller machines.

(2) The same as those terms or related terms are defined in the regulations adopted under the Electronic Fund Transfer Act regarding
 general use reloadable cards.

(f) “Refund” means a return of a sum of money to a customer who has overpaid for services or property or is otherwise owed money by the business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 718, Sec. 2.   (SB 644)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.41.

If a business offers a refund to a customer via a prepaid debit card for a purchase initiated by the customer in California, the business shall provide the customer with at least one other method of receiving the refund other than a prepaid debit card.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.   (AB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Consumer Refund Conditioned on Nondisclosure Agreement [1748.50. - 1748.50.]

1748.50.
